District of Columbia statutes.
7-2401

Declaration of policy.

In the interest of preventing nuclear war, reversing the economic impact of weapons spending, and safeguarding District of Columbia residents, and recognizing that civil defense cannot provide protection from nuclear destruction, it is by the electors declared the public policy of the District of Columbia to support:

(1)

A mutual United States-Soviet Union nuclear weapons freeze as a first step toward arms reduction;

(2)

Redirection of resources to job creation and human needs; and

(3)

Avoidance of nuclear war, not futile preparation to withstand nuclear attack.

Mar. 17, 1983, D.C. Law 4-210, § 2, 30 DCR 1088
1981 Ed., § 6-1511.
Nuclear Test Ban Support: Pursuant to Resolution 6-656, the “Nuclear Test Ban Support Resolution of 1986,” effective May 13, 1986, the Council expressed support for a mutual and verifiable ban of nuclear testing as a first step towards freezing and reversing the arms race between the United States and the Soviet Union.